California statutes. Education Code
(2) The project qualifies for funding under paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 17077.40 and the school district has completed preliminary plans for the project and has received State Department of Education approval of the plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

17077.45.

(a) The board shall establish standards for determining the amount of the supplemental grant funding to be made available for each project under this article.

(1) For a project application qualifying for funding under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 17077.40, the supplemental grant shall be in the form of an adjustment to the per-pupil eligibility of the project. This per-pupil eligibility adjustment shall be calculated to cover costs associated with the project that are uniquely related to the joint-use nature of the project, including, but not limited to, any increased costs associated with planning the joint-use aspect of the project.

(2) For a project application qualifying under paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 17077.40, the supplemental grant may be provided without regard to the existence of per-pupil eligibility pursuant to this chapter, and may be expressed on a per-square-foot cost basis, on a per-pupil cost basis, or on a per-project cost basis.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, project costs may exceed the board’s standards established pursuant to subdivision (a) only if the excess is paid completely by local or joint-use partner sources.

(c) On July 1 of each year the board shall apportion to qualifying applicant school districts those funds that it determines are available for the purpose of this article. The board shall not release funds to a qualifying applicant until the project plans have received all approval required pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, the approval of the Division of the State Architect. If the project does not receive all necessary plan approvals within one year of the date of the apportionment, the board shall rescind the apportionment.

(d) If the total funding for the purposes of this article is not sufficient to fund all of the joint-use projects for funding under this article, the board shall first fund projects eligible under paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 17077.40 in that order. The board may establish other priority standards within that order, as necessary.

(e) Except as expressly provided in this article, projects funded pursuant to this article shall comply with all other requirements of this chapter, except for Article 11 (commencing with Section 17078.10), which shall apply only to projects under this article if they also qualify for funding under Article 11 (commencing with Section 17078.10).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 56.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.7. Testing and Remediation of Lead Levels in Water at Schoolsites [17077.60. - 17077.60.]

17077.60.

(a) (1) With funds made available for this purpose, the board shall provide a grant to test for lead in water outlets used for drinking or preparing food on schoolsites serving kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that were constructed before January 1, 2010, and for the remediation of any water outlets with lead levels in excess of 15 parts per billion.

(2) The board shall release disbursements to school districts with approved applications for purposes of this article, to the extent state funds are available, consistent with the applicable school district’s local and state contribution percentages determined pursuant to Section
 17074.16. Subject to the availability of funds, the board shall apportion funds to an eligible school district only upon review of evidence that the required local matching funds, for the applicable school district determined pursuant to Section 17074.16, have been expended by the school district for the project, have been deposited in the county fund, or will be expended by the school district by the time of completion of the project, and upon review of evidence that the school district has entered into a binding contract for the completion of that project.

(b) (1) A school district that applies for funding to test lead levels in water outlets used for drinking or preparing food shall be required to test all outlets on the schoolsite, except outlets that have been tested or replaced since January 1, 2010.

(2) A school district shall provide the test results to the Office of Public School Construction and the community water system that serves the school district.

(c) (1) A school district may request a grant for the replacement of a water outlet used for drinking or preparing food if the test results indicate lead levels for that water outlet exceed 15 parts per billion.

(2) Additional testing shall be required upon completion of the remediation efforts specified in paragraph (1) to ensure that lead levels have fallen below 15 parts per billion.

(d) The board shall establish funding cycles for allocation of funds. If funds are available at the
 conclusion of the funding cycles, the board may adopt regulations to provide grants to replace any pipes or fixtures that are contributing to the elevated lead levels if lead levels do not fall below 15 parts per billion after additional testing has been performed, as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(e) The board may consider setting a maximum amount on the grant to be provided for testing and remediation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 22.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Critically Overcrowded School Facilities [17078.10. - 17078.30.]

17078.10.

(a) There is hereby established the Critically Overcrowded School Facilities Program to be administered by the board.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “preliminary application” means an application for a preliminary apportionment pursuant to this article.

(c) For the purposes of this article, “preliminary apportionment” means an apportionment made for eligible applicants with critically overcrowded schools in advance of full compliance with all of the application requirements otherwise required for an apportionment pursuant to this chapter.

(d) For the purposes of this article, “final apportionment” has the same meaning as “apportionment” as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 17070.15.

(e) There is hereby established the 2002 Critically Overcrowded School Facilities Account within the 2002 State School Facilities Fund, and the 2004 Critically Overcrowded School Facilities Account within the 2004 State School Facilities Fund, for the purposes of this article. Funds reserved for the purposes of this article shall be placed in those accounts, as appropriate, and shall be available exclusively for projects eligible under this article until the funds are made available for other purposes of this chapter pursuant to Section 17078.30.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 24.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.15.

(a) Unless this article expressly provides otherwise, the provisions contained in the other articles of this chapter shall apply with equal force to a project funded under this article. This article shall control over the provisions of this chapter contained in other articles only to the extent that this article expressly conflicts with those provisions.(b) This article shall apply only to a project that is otherwise eligible under this chapter and that meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The project meets the criteria set forth in Section 17078.18.

(2) The project is to be funded from the proceeds of state bonds approved by the voters at the November 5, 2002, statewide general election, or the 2004 direct primary election or the 2004 statewide general election, as the case may be, that were expressly reserved in the bond act or acts for the purposes set forth in this article.

(c) The state share of project costs and the state per-unhoused-pupil new construction apportionments for programs eligible under this article shall be equal to the share and amounts otherwise provided by the board pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, any applicable adjustments or supplements otherwise authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(d) A school district that elects to utilize per-unhoused-pupil eligibility pursuant to this chapter to support a project pursuant to this article, shall not simultaneously utilize that same eligibility to support any other application pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 24.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.18.

Projects funded under this article shall meet all of the following criteria:

(a) The project is a new construction project to build new pupil capacity to relieve overcrowding.

(b) The proposed school facility shall be located in the proposed general location, as set forth in Section 17078.22, of the school or schools that have the conditions and pupils that establish the eligibility pursuant to this article as set forth in subdivision (c).

(c) At least 75 percent of the projected pupil occupancy of the project facilities shall come from a source school or source schools that have a site pupil population density greater than 115 pupils per acre in grades kindergarten to six, inclusive, or a site pupil population density greater than 90 pupils per acre in grades seven to 12, inclusive, as determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction using enrollment data from the California Basic Educational Data System for the 2001–02 school year. For source schools with grades that include a combination of kindergarten to six, inclusive, and seven to 12, inclusive, the controlling source schoolsite pupil population density shall be the one applicable to the grade levels in which the majority of the pupils are enrolled at the source school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 24.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.20.

(a) The board shall disseminate information to school districts regarding the availability of funding pursuant to this article and the appropriate deadlines for applications.

(b) Applicants for funding pursuant to this article shall submit preliminary applications to the board.

(c) The preliminary applications shall be submitted by May 1, 2003, for projects to be funded with the proceeds of bonds approved by the voters at the November 5, 2002, statewide general election.

(d) Preliminary applications shall be accepted by the board during the period between 60 days before and 120 days after, the 2004 direct primary election, or the 2004 statewide general election, as appropriate for projects to be funded with the proceeds of bonds approved by the voters at the 2004 direct primary election, or the 2004 statewide general election, as appropriate.

(e) If funds are insufficient to fully fund all of the preliminary applicants, the board shall apportion first to those projects that would house pupils from source schools with the highest pupil density levels relative to the State Department of Education standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 935, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.22.

(a) The preliminary applications shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish per-unhoused-pupil eligibility as set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 17071.75).

(2) Identify the unhoused pupil population that the proposed project will serve by determining the number of pupils to be served and the likely source school or schools from which the pupils population will be drawn.

(3) Identify the proposed general location of the needed new facilities pursuant to any of the following:

(A) Within that portion of the attendance area from which one or more elementary schools that would be a source of the per-pupil eligibility for the proposed facility draws its enrollment, or within a one-mile radius of a source school, or within a one-mile radius of any one of the source schools if there are more than one, whichever is greater.

(B) Within the attendance area of a high school, middle school, or junior high school that would be a source of the per-pupil eligibility for the proposed facility or within a three-mile radius of a source school, or within a three-mile radius of any one of the source schools if there are more than one, whichever is greater.

(4) Estimate the total facility cost on a per-pupil basis and estimate the total site acquisition and development costs pursuant to the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17078.24.

(b) The State Department of Education may grant a variance from the distance maximums set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) if the school district demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the variance is necessary in order to adequately provide facilities for the identified source school pupils.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 24.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.24.

(a) On the basis of the preliminary application and upon confirmation by the board of the applicant’s eligibility, the board shall in a timely manner make a preliminary apportionment for applicants under this article exclusively from funds reserved expressly for the purposes of this article.

(b) Preliminary apportionments for site development and acquisition included in the preliminary application pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17078.22 shall be based either on the preliminary appraisal, if available, or on the median costs of appropriately sized parcels within the qualifying area, as determined by the board.

(c) Preliminary apportionments shall include the total estimated state costs of the project, including, but not limited to, site acquisition and development costs related to evaluations and elimination of hazardous materials, an inflation factor, any applicable excess cost allowances, and hardship costs, if any. The board shall adopt regulations establishing standards and methods for setting these costs and for making related estimates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 24.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.25.

(a) Within the maximum time period set forth in Section 17078.30, the applicant shall have a period of up to four years from the date of the preliminary apportionment in which to complete the application for final apportionment.

(b) The applicant may request a single one-year extension of the period set forth in subdivision (a). The board shall grant the request for the single one-year extension if it determines that the applicant has made substantial progress towards completing the requirements for filing an application for final apportionment. The board may grant only one one-year extension for the project and may only grant the extension if granting the extension would not, in total, cause the project to exceed the maximum time period set forth in Section 17078.30.

(c) The board shall adopt regulations setting forth standards for determining the existence of substantial progress within the meaning of subdivision (b).

(d) The governing board of a school district shall report annually to the State Allocation Board regarding the progress made toward completing the requirements for filing an application for final apportionment, and shall annually hold, at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board, a public hearing pursuant to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) to discuss, and to receive public comment regarding, the report.

(e) In its first annual report the governing board of the school district shall certify that the State Department of Education has determined in writing that there is at least one approvable site within the proposed general location of the proposed facility identified pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 17078.22, or within the variance location authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17078.22.

(f) If the applicant for the one-year extension pursuant to subdivision (b) has not made substantial progress to complete the application process within the allotted time period, the preliminary apportionment shall be rescinded and shall be utilized by the board for funding of other projects that have received a preliminary apportionment pursuant to this article, or at the expiration of the maximum time allowed pursuant to Section 17078.30, the board shall use the funds for any other new construction purpose of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 24.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.27.

(a) Upon completion of the preliminary process authorized pursuant to this article, and when a preliminary applicant has complied with the conditions set forth in this chapter for a final apportionment, including, but not limited to, Section 17070.50, the board shall adjust the preliminary apportionment as set forth in subdivision (b) and as necessary to reflect the current eligible grant amounts for final apportionments pursuant to this chapter consistent with regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17078.24. The board shall then convert the adjusted preliminary apportionment to a final apportionment and proceed to completion of the project in the same manner as for any project funded under provisions of this chapter other than this article.

(b) The board may adjust for cost increases only if uncommitted funds reserved expressly for the purposes of this article remain available for those purposes.

(c) For purposes of calculating enrollment to determine eligibility for a final apportionment for a project funded from the Kindergarten-University Public Education Facilities Bond Act of 2002, as set forth in Part 68.1 (commencing with Section 100600), and the Kindergarten-University Public Education Facilities Bond Act of 2004, as set forth in Part 68.2 (commencing with Section 100800), an applicant may use one of the following methods as an alternative to the method provided in subdivision (a) of Section 17071.75:

(1) The current year enrollment as recorded on the cohort survival enrollment projection system described in subdivision (a) of Section 17071.75, for the year in which the application for the final apportionment is submitted.

(2) (A) If eligibility for the preliminary apportionment was calculated pursuant to Section 17071.76, the current year or five-year projected enrollment as recorded on a cohort survival enrollment projection system, developed and approved by the board, that uses pupil residence in the high school attendance area, for the year in which the application for the final apportionment is submitted.

(B) A school district that uses the method described in this paragraph to calculate enrollment shall also use this method to calculate enrollment for all applications it submits for final apportionments for projects for which preliminary apportionments were approved from the same bond authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 710, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.30.

(a) (1) A portion of the funds reserved for the purposes set forth in this article from the proceeds of state bonds approved by the voters at the November 5, 2002, statewide general election that are not included in a preliminary apportionment for an application that is received by the deadline specified in subdivision (c) of Section 17078.20 shall thereafter be available to the board for apportionment for any new construction purpose under any other article of this chapter.

(2) The amount of funds that shall be made available to the board for purposes other than this article, pursuant to this subdivision, shall be calculated as follows:

(A) Add the total amount preliminarily apportioned to 15 percent of that amount.

(B) Take the number calculated pursuant to subparagraph (A) and subtract that number from the amount originally reserved for the purposes of this article.

(C) The number calculated pursuant to subparagraph (B) shall thereafter be available to the board for any new construction purpose under any other article of this chapter.

(3) All funds reserved for the purposes set forth in this article from the proceeds of state bonds approved by the voters at the November 5, 2002, statewide general election pursuant to a preliminary apportionment that are not included within a final apportionment within the timeframes permitted by Section 17078.25 shall thereafter be available to the board for apportionment for any new construction purpose under any other article of this chapter.

(b) (1) A portion of the funds reserved for the purposes set forth in this article from the proceeds of state bonds approved by the voters at the 2004 direct primary election, or the 2004 statewide general election, as appropriate, that are not included in a preliminary apportionment for an application that is received by the deadline specified in subdivision (d) of Section 17078.20 shall thereafter be available to the board for apportionment for any new construction purpose under any other article of this chapter.

(2) The amount of funds that shall be made available to the board for purposes other than this article, pursuant to this subdivision, shall be calculated as follows:

(A) Add the total amount preliminarily apportioned to 15 percent of that amount.

(B) Take the number calculated pursuant to subparagraph (A) and subtract that number from the amount originally reserved for the purposes of this article.

(C) The number calculated pursuant to subparagraph (B) shall thereafter be available to the board for any new construction purpose under any other article of this chapter.

(3) All funds reserved for the purposes set forth in this article from the proceeds of state bonds approved by the voters at the 2004 direct primary election, or the 2004 statewide general election, as appropriate, pursuant to a preliminary apportionment that are not included within a final apportionment within the timeframes permitted by Section 17078.25 shall thereafter be available to the board for apportionment for any new construction purpose under any other article of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 935, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11.5. Assistance to Small School Districts [17078.35. - 17078.38.]

17078.35.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Final apportionment” has the same meaning as “apportionment” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 17070.15.

(b) “Preliminary application” means an application for a preliminary apportionment pursuant to this article.

(c) “Preliminary apportionment” means a reservation of bond authority for eligible applicants under
 this article in advance of full compliance with all of the application requirements otherwise required for an apportionment pursuant to this chapter.

(d) “Project and construction management grant” means a grant for purposes of obtaining the services from a county office of education, other local educational agency with applicable school facilities construction expertise, applicable state department, or a certified private construction consulting entity from the list maintained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 17078.47, to assist with the planning, site acquisition,
 preconstruction, construction, and closeout of a project.

(e) “Small school district” is a school district, as defined in Section 17070.15, with an enrollment of fewer than 2,501 pupils.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 23.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.36.

(a) Unless this article expressly provides otherwise, the provisions contained in the other articles of this chapter shall apply with equal force to a project funded under this article. This article shall control over the provisions of this chapter contained in other articles only to the extent that this article expressly conflicts with those provisions.

(b) This article shall apply only to a small school district that is otherwise eligible under this chapter for a project that meets both
 of the following:

(1) The project meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 17078.37.

(2) The project is to be funded from proceeds of state bonds approved by the voters at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election that shall not
 exceed the amounts made available pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 101412.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 23.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.37.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 17072.30 and subdivision (a) of Section 17074.16, as applicable:

(a) Applicants for funding pursuant to this article shall do both of the following:

(1) Submit preliminary applications to the board.

(2) Meet the eligibility requirements described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 17071.75) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 17073.10), as
 applicable.

(b) The board shall do both of the following:

(1) Accept a preliminary application from, and make a preliminary apportionment to, a small school district for new construction grants pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 17072.10) or modernization grants pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 17074.10) in a manner substantially identical to the preliminary apportionment requirements established in Section 17078.24, except that the eligibility of the applicant shall be based on the criteria established in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) If requested, provide a preliminary apportionment of a project and construction management grant equal to 5 percent of the state share of the
 preliminary apportionment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 23.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.38.

The board shall adopt regulations setting forth all of the following:

(a) The preliminary application and preliminary apportionment.

(b) The apportionment of design grants, project assistance grants pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 17072.10 and subdivision (e) of Section 17074.10, as applicable, and project and construction management grants to applicants that qualify for financial hardship assistance pursuant to Section 17075.15, as part of the
 preliminary apportionment.

(c) The existence of substantial progress requirements on apportionments for design and site grants identical to the requirements set forth in Section 1859.105 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) The requirements for a final apportionment for the project in a manner substantially identical to the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 17078.25.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 23.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11.7. State Augmentation of Federal Supporting America’s School Infrastructure Grant Program for Priority School Districts [17078.45. - 17078.48.]

17078.45.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Centralized online resources” means an online portal or webpage dedicated to facilities maintenance and capital outlay in support of priority school districts.

(b) “Direct technical assistance” means professional support on facilities maintenance and capital outlay provided in person to a priority school district at the site.

(c) “Priority school district” means a school district that the State Department of Education determines is in need of capital outlay assistance. The State Department of Education’s determination is based on the school district meeting one or
 more of the following criteria:

(1) An enrollment of fewer than 2,501 pupils.

(2) Low gross bonding capacity per enrollment.

(3) A high percentage of unduplicated pupils.

(4) Has not previously submitted an application for funding pursuant to the School Facility Program.

(d) “SASI Grant” means the federal Supporting America’s School Infrastructure Grant Program.

(e) “State and county collaboration” means the joint efforts of the State Department of Education, county offices of education, and other state agencies, such as the Division of the State Architect and the Office of Public School Construction, to provide regional
 resource centers throughout the state to ensure priority school districts have access to local support.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 24.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.46.

(a) The board shall provide a grant of five million dollars ($5,000,000) to the State Department of Education to expand the objectives of the SASI Grant and support priority school districts as described in this article. The grant funds shall be made available from the amounts allocated pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 101412 at the board’s discretion.

(b) Any portion of the amount described in subdivision (a) that is not allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) by January 1, 2030, shall be available for the purposes described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 101412, as determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 24.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.47.

The bond funds allocated to the State Department of Education pursuant to Section 17070.46 shall be used for all of the following purposes:

(a) Direct technical assistance to priority school districts, including training in at least all of the following:

(1) Tools used to determine if a school facility is in “good repair” as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 17002 and rating a facility pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 17002.

(2) Developing a schoolsite inventory.

(3) Assessing facility needs, estimating costs, and
 prioritizing projects.

(4) Identifying funding options, including eligibility to participate in the school facilities program.

(5) Developing facility contracts, including testing, architectural services, inspections, and construction.

(b) State and county collaboration efforts, including at least all of the following:

(1) Developing a regional network of facilities and maintenance staff at county offices of education throughout the state to sustain ongoing support for priority school districts.

(2) Conducting quarterly meetings throughout the state, in partnership with the Division of the State Architect and the Office of Public School Construction, designed to address the facilities
 challenges faced by priority school districts.

(3) Partnering with other state agencies and organizations representing priority school districts with limited expertise and capacity.

(c) Development and maintenance of centralized online resources, including at least all of the following:

(1) Dedicating a portal or webpage to school facilities maintenance to support maintenance assessment, state and national funding programs, and contract development and management.

(2) Providing standardized forms and tools for use by priority school districts.

(3) Developing an on-demand library of resources, including webinars, videos, and additional learning tools.

(d) State level expertise on facility maintenance, which may include both of the following:

(1) Building the capacity of the State Department of Education and county offices of education in supporting priority school districts.

(2) Establishing, in partnership with the Division of the State Architect and the Office of Public School Construction, a certification process for private construction consultants and maintaining an up-to-date list of certified consultants for use by priority school districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 24.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.48.

The State Department of Education shall adopt regulations setting forth the requirements and procedures for the allocation and use of bond funds pursuant to this article, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) The process for determining recipients of direct technical assistance.

(b) The framework for state and county collaboration efforts.

(c) The development, maintenance, and accessibility of centralized online resources.

(d) Reporting and accountability measures to ensure the effective use of the allocated funds and the achievement of its intended
 outcomes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 24.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Charter Schools [17078.52. - 17078.66.]

17078.52.

(a) There is hereby established the Charter School Facilities Program to provide funding to qualifying entities for the purpose of establishing school facilities for charter school pupils.

(b) (1) The 2002 Charter School Facilities Account is hereby established within the 2002 State School Facilities Fund established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17070.40. The proceeds of bonds, as set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 100620, shall be deposited into the 2002 Charter School Facilities Account for the purposes of this article. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, funds deposited
 into the account are hereby continuously appropriated for the purposes of this article.

(2) The 2004 Charter School Facilities Account is hereby established within the 2004 State School Facilities Fund established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17070.40. The proceeds of bonds, as set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 100820, if approved by the voters, shall be deposited into the 2004 Charter School Facilities Account for the purposes of this article. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, funds deposited into the account are hereby continuously appropriated for the purposes of this article.

(3) The 2006 Charter School Facilities Account is hereby established within the 2006 State School Facilities Fund established pursuant
 to subdivision (d) of Section 17070.40. The proceeds of bonds, as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 101012, if approved by the voters, shall be deposited into the 2006 Charter School Facilities Account for the purposes of this article. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, funds deposited into the account are hereby continuously appropriated for the purposes of this article.

(4) The 2024 Charter School Facilities Account is hereby established within the 2024 State School Facilities Fund established pursuant to Section 17070.42. The proceeds of bonds, as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 101412 and if approved
 by the voters at the
 November 5, 2024, statewide general election, shall be deposited into the 2024 Charter School Facilities Account for purposes of this article. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, funds deposited into the account are hereby continuously appropriated for purposes of this article.

(c) As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Authority” means the California School Finance Authority established pursuant to Section 17172.

(2) “Account” means the pertinent
 account established under subdivision (b).

(3) “Preliminary apportionment” means an apportionment made for eligible applicants under this article in advance of full compliance with all of the application requirements otherwise required for an apportionment pursuant to this chapter. The process for making preliminary apportionments under this article shall be
 substantially identical to the process established for critically overcrowded schools pursuant to Sections 17078.22 to 17078.30, inclusive.

(4) “Financially sound” means a charter school that has demonstrated, over a period of time determined by the authority, but not less than 24 months immediately preceding the submission of the application, that it has operated as a financially capable concern in California, as measured by criteria established by the authority. A charter school that cannot demonstrate that it has been a financially capable concern for at least 24 months immediately preceding the submission of the application, due solely to not having operated as a charter school for at least 24 months, may meet this 24-month requirement if the charter school is managed by staff who have at least 24 months of documented
 experience, as measured by criteria established by the authority and the charter school has an educational plan, financial resources, facilities expertise, management expertise, and has been a financially capable concern for at least 24 months, as established by the authority.

(d) The board shall, from time to time, transfer funds within the account to the California School Finance Authority Fund for the purposes of this article pursuant to the request of the authority as set forth in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 25.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17078.53.

(a) The initial preliminary applications for projects to be funded pursuant to this article shall be submitted to the board by March 31, 2003. Thereafter, the board may establish subsequent application periods as needed.

(b) Preliminary applications may be submitted by eligible applicants as set forth in this article by either of the following:

(1) A school district on behalf of a charter school that is physically located within the geographical jurisdiction of the school district.

(2) A charter school on its own behalf if the charter school has notified both the superintendent and the governing board of the school district in which it is physically located of its intent to do so in writing at least 30 days prior to submission of the preliminary application.

(c) A preliminary application shall demonstrate either of the following:

(1) That a charter petition for the school for which the application is submitted has been granted by the appropriate chartering entity prior to the application deadline determined by the board.

(2) That an already existing charter has been amended to include the school for which the application is submitted and approved by the appropriate chartering entity prior to the deadline determined by the board.

(d) A preliminary application shall include either of the following:
